Utah statutes.
58-68-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.
Grounds for division action regarding the following are under Section
58-1-401:
(1)  refusing to issue a license to an applicant or refusing to renew the
license of a licensee;
(2)  revoking, suspending, restricting, placing on probation the license of a
licensee;
(3)  assessing an administrative penalty; and
(4)  issuing of a public or private reprimand to a licensee or issuance of a
cease and desist order.
